Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 22 Curriculum [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-22-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 177, § 11; P.L. 1940, ch. 826, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-1

; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 15, effective August 9, 1996.

16-22-2.
Civics education.

The general assembly recognizes the importance of a citizenry well educated in the principles of democracy as enunciated in the constitutions of the state of Rhode Island and the United States. The general assembly directs the board of regents for elementary and secondary education to develop and adopt a set of grade level standards K-12 in civics education no later than August 31, 2007. These standards shall include, but not be limited to, the history of the state of Rhode Island, representative government, the rights and duties of actively engaged citizenship, and the principals of democracy. These civic education standards shall be used in the public schools of this state beginning in kindergarten and continuing through to and including grade 12. No private school or private instruction shall be approved for the purposes of chapter 19 of this title unless the course of study shall make provision for instruction substantially equivalent to that required by this chapter for public schools.

All middle and high school students attending public schools, or any other schools managed and controlled by the state, shall demonstrate proficiency, as defined by the local school district, in civics education that shall also satisfy half credit or course requirement in history and social studies.

Each public school district shall provide not less than one student-led civics project for students during either middle or high school; provided, however, that each such project shall be consistent with the history and social studies standards and frameworks promulgated by the Rhode Island board of education. Civics projects may be individual, small group, or class wide, and designed to promote a student’s ability to:

Reason, make logical arguments, and support claims using valid evidence; and

Demonstrate an understanding of the connections between federal, state, and local policies, including issues that may impact the student’s community.

The department of education shall begin implementing subsections (b) and (c) of this section for the 2022-2023 academic year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 17; P.L. 1922, ch. 2195, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 30; P.L. 1926, ch. 838, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1400, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 177, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-2

; P.L. 2005, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 220, § 1, effective July 8, 2021.

16-22-3.
Instruction in physiology and hygiene.

The school committees of the several cities and towns shall make provision for the instruction of the pupils in all schools supported wholly, or in part, by public money, in physiology and hygiene, with special reference to the effects of alcoholic liquors, stimulants, and narcotics upon the human system.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-3

.

16-22-4.
Instruction in health and physical education.

All children in grades one through twelve (12) attending public schools, or any other schools managed and controlled by the state, except as provided in §

16-100-3(d)

, shall receive in those schools instruction in health and physical education under rules and regulations the department of elementary and secondary education may prescribe or approve during periods that shall average at least twenty (20) minutes in each school day. No private school or private instruction shall be approved by any school committee for the purposes of chapter 19 of this title as substantially equivalent to that required by law of a child attending a public school in the same city or town unless instruction in health and physical education similar to that required in public schools shall be given. Commencing September 1, 2012, the required health education curriculum shall be based on the health education standards of the Rhode Island health education framework: health literacy for all students as promulgated by the Rhode Island department of education and consistent with the mandated health instructional outcomes therein. Commencing September 1, 2012, the required physical education curriculum shall be based on the physical education standards of the Rhode Island physical education framework: supporting physically active lifestyles through quality physical education as promulgated by the Rhode Island department of education and consistent with the instructional outcomes therein.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall incorporate, in consultation with the state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, substance abuse prevention and suicide prevention into the health education curriculum. For the purpose of this section, “substance abuse prevention” means the implementation of evidence-based, age-appropriate programs, practices, or curricula related to the use and abuse of alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs; “suicide prevention” means the implementation of evidence-based, appropriate programs, practices, or curricula related to mental health awareness and suicide prevention. Further, “substance abuse prevention” and suicide prevention programs shall specifically include information provided to students that mixing opioids and alcohol can cause accidental death.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 182, § 9; P.L. 1949, ch. 2341, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-4

; P.L. 2008, ch. 254, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 463, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 254, § 1.

16-22-4.1.
Rhode Island healthy weight pilot program established.

The state shall establish pilot programs in communities of the several cities and towns to encourage and promote healthy weight and weight management in children. These programs shall incorporate a combination of exercise and nutrition plans that may include, but shall not be limited to, physical exercise, including walking and jogging, as well as information on healthy food choices.

Funding for these pilot programs shall be acquired from federal grants and related funds allocated to the state for purposes of combating obesity, and through such additional sources as the legislature shall deem appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 224, § 1.

16-22-4.2.
Free-play recess.

All children attending public schools, or any other schools managed or controlled by the state, that have elementary grades kindergarten through six (6) shall receive in those schools at least twenty (20) consecutive minutes of supervised, safe, and unstructured free-play recess each day. Free-play recess may be considered instructional time for those schools that would be required to extend the current school day in order to meet this requirement. Teachers shall make a good-faith effort to not withhold recess for punitive reasons. Free-play recess is in addition to the requirements set forth in §

16-22-4

. As used herein, the term “free play” means an unstructured environment, but which is supervised by appropriate school personnel or staff.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 151, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 157, § 2.

16-22-5.
Course in fire prevention prescribed.

The department of elementary and secondary education is empowered and directed to prescribe a course of study in fire prevention for use in the public schools of the state, dealing with the protection of lives and property against loss or damage as a result of preventable fire.

History of Section.

P.L. 1921, ch. 2025, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 177, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-5

.

16-22-6.
Duty of school officials to arrange for fire prevention course.

It shall be the duty of the department of elementary and secondary education, school superintendents, school committees, or other committees or persons having control of public schools in cities and towns to arrange for a course of study in fire prevention, and require its use in each school under its or their control or direction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1921, ch. 2025, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 177, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-6

.

16-22-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1921, ch. 2025, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 66, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 177, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-7

; Repealed by P.L. 1978, ch. 266, § 1.

16-22-8.
Foreign language courses.

Whenever there shall be twenty (20) students who apply for a course in the Italian, Portuguese, or Spanish language in any high school of the state, the school committee of the specific city or town shall arrange a course in Italian, Portuguese, or Spanish to be conducted by a competent teacher.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall establish uniform criteria for the assessment of foreign language proficiency skills of students seeking academic credits that are commensurate to the competency level demonstrated in that foreign language.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 32; P.L. 1934, ch. 2127, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

16-22-8

; P.L. 1960, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 40.

16-22-9.
Uniform testing.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall establish a program for uniform achievement testing of pupils in elementary and secondary schools in the state. Pupils attending public schools shall be administered tests under the supervision of the state department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with the program. Pupils attending nonpublic elementary and secondary schools approved in accordance with the provisions of the general and public laws of the state may, upon request of the nonpublic school, be administered tests under the supervision of the state department of elementary and secondary education in accordance with the programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 46, § 1.

16-22-9.1.
Foster care youth academic reports.

Every superintendent of schools employed in accordance with the provisions of chapter 2 of this title shall on or before September 15, 2022, and annually thereafter on or before September 15, complete a report on the progress and status of educational achievement and development of all foster care youth attending every public school under the superintendent’s care and supervision. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

The total number of foster care youth identified by school and grade of instruction;

The number of foster care youth receiving supplementary literacy instruction pursuant to the provisions of §

16-67-2

;

The foster care youth uniform testing scores for testing pursuant to the provisions of §

16-22-9

, and the percentage of foster care youth who meet or exceed the mean average score for uniform testing;

The percentage of foster care youth meeting academic standards;

The number and percentage of foster care youth receiving alternative or special education services;

The number of foster care youth suspended or expelled from school during the academic year;

The number of foster care youth identified as involved in chronic absenteeism, truancy, or as drop-outs; and

The number of foster care youth assigned to advanced placement.

If the superintendent determines based on the information provided in the report prepared pursuant to subsection (a) of this section that foster care youth are disproportionately failing to meet academic standards or are disproportionately subject to school discipline compared to the overall student population, then the superintendent shall develop a remediation plan and include the remediation plan as part of the report promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Every superintendent shall provide a copy of the reports promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the applicable school committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 298, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 299, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

16-22-10.
Voting instruction.

The school committees of the several cities, towns, and school districts shall provide for students of the senior class in high school a course of instruction and demonstration in the operation of a voting machine, and of the manner of casting a valid ballot. The board of elections is directed to make available to each city and town school committee one voting machine per city or town to carry out the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 139, § 1.

16-22-11.
Pledge of allegiance.

All public schools, commencing with preprimary school through and including high school, shall commence each day with the following pledge:

“I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America and to the republic for which it stands, one nation, under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all.”

Any person not wishing to participate in the “pledge of allegiance” is exempt from participation and need not participate in the pledge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 282, § 1.

16-22-12.
Required courses on alcohol and substance abuse.

The school committees of the several cities, towns, and school districts shall provide for the incorporation of mandatory instruction of students in grades one through twelve (12) on the effects of alcohol and substance abuse upon the human system in existing health education or other courses.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall institute courses of instructions for teachers in the public school system on the effects of alcohol and substance abuse.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 303, § 1.

16-22-13.
Consumer education.

The council on elementary and secondary education (the “council”), in consultation with the Rhode Island department of education (the “department”), shall develop and approve statewide academic standards for the instruction of consumer education in public high schools by no later than December 31, 2021, and again as required by the procedures set forth in subsections (e) and (f) of this section.

By the start of the 2022-2023 school year, the school committees of the several cities, towns, and local education agencies (“LEAs”) shall ensure that public high schools offer a course that includes instruction in consumer education that is aligned with the statewide standards.

The standards shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, installment purchasing, budgeting, comparison of prices, credit and the law, employment and income, rights and responsibilities in the marketplace, money management, maintaining credit, saving, investing, protecting and insuring assets, and other personal finance or consumer economic topics of study.

The standards shall:

Clearly set forth the skills, competencies, and knowledge expected to be demonstrated by all students at the conclusion of individual grades or grade spans;

Reflect sensitivity to different learning styles; and

Be in a form readily comprehensible by the public.

The council shall review the consumer education standards regularly, making changes if appropriate, to ensure that the standards continue to outline the knowledge and skills students are expected to demonstrate regarding the responsible and informed use of financial services. The review cycle shall begin in 2026, with subsequent reviews taking place in 2031, 2036, and every five (5) years thereafter.

Any recommended changes or updates to existing standards shall be approved by the council at least sixty (60) days prior to the changes taking effect.

Beginning with the graduating class of 2024, all students shall demonstrate proficiency in consumer education prior to graduating high school. LEAs shall have the discretion to allow students the ability to demonstrate proficiency by one or more of the following:

Successful completion of a consumer education course of study aligned with the standards developed and approved by the council;

Successful completion of a project aligned with the standards developed and approved by the council, under the supervision of a certified educator;

Successful completion of a consumer education assessment that is aligned with the standards developed and approved by the council and taken in a controlled testing environment; or

Another demonstration of proficiency approved by the council.

Schools shall be permitted to make exceptions and accommodations to the requirements of this section for students with disabilities, as provided in chapter 24 of this title, in those cases wherein the student cannot be reasonably expected to demonstrate proficiency to council standards.

The council, in consultation with the department, shall compile and publish the following by April 1, 2022:

A list of micro-credentialing programs that train educators in the skills necessary to deliver consumer education lessons in accordance with statewide standards; and

Resources and instructional materials including, but not limited to, lesson plans, assessments, and activities that align with the consumer education standards adopted by the council.

The council shall review the list of micro-credentialing programs and resources and instructional materials compiled in subsection (i) of this section regularly, making changes if appropriate. The review cycle shall begin in 2026, with subsequent reviews taking place in 2031, 2036, and every five (5) years thereafter.

By August 1, 2024, and annually by August 1 thereafter, the department shall publish a report on the consumer education instruction in Rhode Island schools. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

The number of high school students at each grade level who have completed a high-school level course of study in consumer education that is aligned with the standards developed and approved by the council; and

A list of the middle schools and elementary schools that have incorporated consumer education into their curricula.

This section shall not apply to private schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 31, § 1, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 35, § 1, effective June 1, 2021.

16-22-14.
Suicide prevention awareness.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and prescribe a suicide prevention awareness program for public school students in grades nine (9) through twelve (12). The school committees of the several cities, towns, and school districts shall provide for the incorporation of the program in existing health education courses.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall institute workshops to be developed and provided by the Samaritans, Inc. for those public school teachers designated to teach the suicide prevention awareness program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 546, § 1.

16-22-15.
Cardiopulmonary resuscitation training.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and prescribe a cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training course for public school students in the state. The course shall be established in accordance with the requirements and criteria obtained from the Red Cross and/or the American Heart Association and the director of the department of health.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate course guidelines including the age or grade level of pupils required to receive cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training. This shall at a minimum include psychomotor skill-based cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training and an overview of automated external defibrillator (AED) use for all high school students prior to graduation. “Psychomotor skill” is defined as the use of hands-on practicing to support cognitive learning. Cognitive-only training does not qualify. Formal certification is not required.

The school committees of the several cities, towns, and school districts shall provide for the incorporation of the course in training in existing health education courses. The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish a procedure for monitoring adherence to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 127, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 134, § 1.

16-22-16.
Blocked air passage treatment training.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop and prescribe a training course in the emergency treatment for blocked air passages. The course shall be established in accordance with criteria and requirements established by the director of the department of health. The department of elementary and secondary education shall determine the age or grade level of pupils required to receive training.

The school committees of the several cities, towns, and school districts shall provide for the incorporation of the course of training in existing health education courses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 62, § 1.

16-22-17.
AIDS education program.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall, pursuant to rules promulgated by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and the director of the department of health, establish comprehensive AIDS (acquired immune deficiency syndrome) instruction, which shall provide students with accurate information and instruction on AIDS transmission and prevention, and which course shall also address abstinence from sexual activity as the preferred means of prevention, as a basic education program requirement.

Upon written request to the school principal, a pupil not less than eighteen (18) years of age or a parent or legal guardian of a pupil less than eighteen (18) years of age, within a reasonable period of time after the request is made, shall be permitted to examine the curriculum program instruction materials at the school in which his or her child is enrolled.

A parent or legal guardian may exempt his or her child from the program by written directive to the principal of the school. No child so exempted shall be penalized academically by reason of the exemption.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 464, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 400, § 1.

16-22-18.
Health and family life courses.

Every secondary school teaching courses in family life or sex education within this state shall include, as part of the course instruction, abstinence from sexual activity and refraining from sexual intercourse as the preferred method of pregnancy prevention and the prevention of sexually transmitted diseases. Provided further, part of the course instruction may incorporate age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on the law and meaning of consent. Such age-appropriate and developmentally appropriate elements of effective and evidence-based programs on the prevention of pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and sexual violence may include instruction that increases student awareness of the fact that consent is required before sexual activity.

Upon written request to the school principal, a pupil not less than eighteen (18) years of age or a parent or legal guardian of a pupil less than eighteen (18) years of age, within a reasonable period of time after the request is made, shall be permitted to examine the curriculum program instruction materials at the school in which his or her child is enrolled.

A parent or legal guardian may exempt his or her child from the program by written directive to the principal of the school. No child so exempted shall be penalized academically by reason of the exemption.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 575, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 400, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 191, § 1.

16-22-19.
Electronic news or educational programming.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

16-38-6

, all cities and towns may establish a program utilizing the display of televised commercial advertising necessarily incidental to the use and display of electronic news, internet access, or educational programming by school officials in connection with the curriculum of the public schools in the cities and towns.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 484, § 1.

16-22-20.
Animal dissection and vivisection — Right to refuse — Alternate learning project required.

A parent(s) or legal guardian of any student in a public or nonpublic primary or secondary school may refuse to allow their child to dissect or vivisect any vertebrate or invertebrate animal, or any part of a vertebrate or invertebrate animal.

A school that offers dissection or vivisection as a learning activity shall permit those students whose parent(s) or legal guardian refuse to allow them to participate to demonstrate competency through an alternative method of learning the material that would be covered in the activity. Alternative materials and methods may include but not be limited to: video tapes, models, films, books, computer programs, clay modeling or transparencies.

A teacher shall not discriminate against a student for not participating in dissection or vivisection and shall not lower a grade because a student’s parent or legal guardian has chosen an alternative education project.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 214, § 1.

16-22-21.
Community service learning.

The legislature recognizes the importance of community service learning as a means of enhancing life in the community and as a way of enlightening young people about the needs of others. Whenever young people are led through teaching and example, the likelihood of their becoming productive citizens in society is increased a thousandfold.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall encourage the establishment of community service learning programs in local school districts by developing a model program and appropriate guidelines for implementation of the model program. Any local school district may petition the commissioner of education for approval of its community service learning program, which may be used in partial fulfillment of the requirement for obtaining a high school diploma. The commissioner shall develop criteria that local school districts may use as a means of determining and recognizing community service learning activities for credit towards a high school diploma. Local school districts that elect to establish community service learning programs pursuant to this section shall submit community service learning program plans for approval by the commissioner every five (5) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 47, § 1.

16-22-22.
Genocide and human rights education.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall, pursuant to rules promulgated by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, develop curricular material on genocide and human rights issues and guidelines for the teaching of that material. The material and guidelines shall include, but not be limited to: (1) the period of the transatlantic slave trades and the middle passage; (2) the great hunger period in Ireland; (3) the Armenian genocide; (4) the Holocaust; and (5) the Mussolini fascist regime and other recognized human rights violations. In formulating this program the department shall consult with practicing teachers, principals, superintendents and experts knowledgeable in genocide and human rights issues. Local school committees may incorporate the material into their elementary and secondary school curriculum.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 511, § 1.

16-22-23.
Mathematics, English/Language Arts, and Science.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall select and/or develop a statewide curriculum (i) in Mathematics and English/Language Arts for students in grades kindergarten (k) through twelve (12) by August 31, 2006 and (ii) in Science for students in grades kindergarten (k) through twelve (12) by August 31, 2008.

The curriculum selected and/or developed by the board of regents shall:

Be aligned with state standards and assessments utilized by the state department of elementary and secondary education;

Contain sufficient detail to guide teachers in planning lessons aligned with state standards and assessments.

By November 1, 2006, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall prepare an outline for development and implementation of the science curriculum utilizing appropriate groups and then shall convene a science curriculum advisory committee for the purpose of developing recommended curriculum to the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. The science advisory committee shall include teachers, representatives of teacher unions, administrators, curriculum directors, school committee members, and experts designated by the commissioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 19, § 4.

16-22-24.
Dating violence education.

Each school district shall incorporate dating violence education that is age-appropriate into the annual health curriculum framework for students in grades seven (7) through twelve (12).

Dating violence education shall include, but not be limited to: defining dating violence; recognizing dating violence warning signs; and characteristics of healthy relationships. Additionally, students shall be provided with the school district’s dating violence policy as provided in §

16-21-30(c)

.

For the purposes of this section:

“At school” means in a classroom, on or immediately adjacent to the school premises, on a school bus or other school-related vehicle, at an official school bus stop, or at any school sponsored activity or event whether or not it is on school grounds.

“Dating partner” means any person involved in an intimate association with another primarily characterized by the expectation of affectionate involvement whether casual, serious, or long-term.

“Dating violence” means a pattern of abusive or coercive behaviors used to exert power and control over a current or former dating partner. Behaviors may occur online, in person, or through the use of technology. Abuse may be physical, verbal, emotional, sexual, financial, or psychological and includes threats, isolation, and intimidation.

To assist school districts in developing a dating violence education program, the department of education shall review and approve the grade-level topics relating to dating violence and healthy relationships in the “health literacy for all students: the Rhode Island health education framework”.

The provisions of this section shall be amended in the health education curriculum sections of the Rhode Island rules and regulations for school health programs, R16-21-SCHO, and the Rhode Island basic education program at their next revisions.

Upon written request to the school principal, a parent or legal guardian of a pupil less than eighteen (18) years of age, within a reasonable period of time after the request is made, shall be permitted to examine the dating violence education program instruction materials at the school in which his or her child is enrolled.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 287, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 490, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 319, § 2, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 320, § 2, effective July 9, 2021.

16-22-25.
Lyme disease awareness and prevention program.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall, in collaboration with the department of health, make Lyme disease awareness and prevention resources available for all public school students in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 81, § 4; P.L. 2010, ch. 87, § 4.

16-22-26.
Age appropriate sexual abuse and assault awareness education.

Short title. This section shall be known and may be cited as “Erin Merryn’s Law.”

Prevention of child abduction, child sexual exploitation, and child sexual abuse.

All pupils in grades kindergarten through eight (8) in all public schools in the state shall receive instruction designed to prevent the abduction, exploitation, or sexual abuse of children. Such instruction shall be provided by, or under the direct supervision of, regular classroom teachers; provided, however, that such instruction may be provided by any other agency, public or private.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall continue to provide guidance and materials on age-appropriate sexual abuse and assault awareness and prevention. The commissioner shall provide technical assistance to assist in the development of curricula that shall be age-appropriate and developed according to the needs and abilities of pupils at successive grade levels in order to provide awareness skills, information, self-confidence, and support to aid in the prevention of child abduction, child sexual exploitation, and child sexual abuse.

Action by school committees. The school committees of the several cities, towns, and school districts shall provide for the incorporation of the curricula described herein into existing health education courses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 373, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 404, § 2.

16-22-27.
Availability of instruction in musical performance education.

All secondary public schools, including middle schools, or any other secondary schools managed and controlled by the state, are strongly encouraged to offer as a part of the curriculum, courses in performing arts, including musical ensembles, such as band, chorus, orchestra, and other performance ensembles, with emphasis upon development of aesthetic appreciation and the skills of creative expression.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 232, § 1.

16-22-28.
Instruction in media literacy.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall consider, in consultation with national or statewide organizations focused on media literacy, the incorporation of media literacy education into the board of education’s basic education program regulations.

For the purposes of this section, “media literacy” means the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, create, and communicate using a variety of forms, including, but not limited to, print, visual, audio, interactive, and digital texts.

History of Section.

P.L. 2017, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 256, § 1.

16-22-29.
Field trips to nature preserve, reserve, or conservatory.

The general assembly recognizes the importance of a citizenry well educated in the principles of nature and our environment, as well as the general assembly’s duty to provide for the preservation, regeneration, and restoration of the natural environment of the state, as enunciated in the constitution of the state of Rhode Island. In light of this, public schools of this state, beginning in kindergarten and continuing through and including grade twelve (12), are encouraged to use their best efforts to provide access to every student to at least one field trip to a nature preserve, reserve, or conservatory.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 199, § 1.

16-22-30.
Statewide academic standards.

The council on elementary and secondary education (the “council”) shall direct the commissioner of elementary and secondary education (the “commissioner”) to institute a process to develop statewide academic standards for the core subjects of mathematics, English language arts, science and technology, history and social studies, world languages, and the arts. This process shall:

Be open and consultative;

Include, but need not be limited to, a culturally and racially diverse group of classroom teachers and students; and

Include, but need not be limited to, reviewing and revising current standards, as well as adopting new ones, if deemed appropriate.

The commissioner shall develop the statewide academic standards pursuant to this section by no later than December 31, 2019, and again as required by the council’s procedures set forth in subsection (f) of this section. The standards shall:

Cover grades prekindergarten through grade twelve (PK-12);

Clearly set forth the skills, competencies, and knowledge expected to be demonstrated by all students at the conclusion of individual grades or grade spans;

Be formulated so as to set high expectations for student performance;

Provide clear and specific examples that embody and reflect these high expectations;

Be constructed with due regard to the established research and recommendations of national organizations, to the best of similar efforts in other states, and to the level of skills, competencies, and knowledge possessed by typical students in the most educationally-advanced nations. The skills, competencies, and knowledge set forth in the standards shall define the performance outcomes expected of both students directly entering the workforce and of students pursuing higher education. In addition, the skills, competencies, and knowledge set forth in the standards shall inform the design and implementation of the Rhode Island comprehensive assessment system (“RICAS”) in mathematics, English language arts, and science and technology. The RICAS shall align with federal law, be in place for no fewer than ten (10) years, and facilitate comparisons of students of other states and nations;

Be designed to instill respect for the cultural, ethnic, and racial diversity of this state, and for the contributions made by diverse cultural, ethnic, and racial groups to the life of this state;

Be designed to avoid perpetuating gender, cultural, ethnic, or racial stereotypes;

Reflect sensitivity to different learning styles;

Reflect sensitivity to impediments to learning, which may include issues related to, but not limited to, cultural, financial, emotional, health, and social factors; and

Be in a form readily comprehensible by the general public.

This section shall not require the abandonment of any standards already in place, so long as the commissioner determines that these standards meet the statewide goals contained herein.

The commissioner shall submit a copy of the standards to the council for approval at least sixty (60) days prior to the standards taking effect.

Upon approval, the council shall make the standards available to the public.

The council shall develop procedures for updating, improving, or refining standards pursuant to this section by no later than September 1, 2021. The procedures shall include a requirement that the council review and evaluate the standards regularly to ensure that the high quality of the standards is maintained. The review cycle shall begin in 2025, with subsequent reviews taking place in 2029, 2033, and every four (4) years thereafter.

On or before December 1, 2020, and annually thereafter on or before December 1, the commissioner shall report to the governor, president of the senate, and the speaker of the house, regarding the standards developed and reviewed pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 150, § 1.